Washington statutes.
RCW 39.35.060

Life-cycle cost analysis—Review fees.

The department may impose fees upon affected public agencies for the review of life-cycle cost analyses. The fees shall be deposited in the enterprise services account. The purpose of the fees is to recover the costs by the department for review of the analyses. The department shall set fees at a level necessary to recover all of its costs related to increasing the energy efficiency of state-supported new construction. The fees shall not exceed one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of any project or exceed two thousand dollars for any project unless mutually agreed to. The department shall provide detailed calculation ensuring that the energy savings resulting from its review of life-cycle cost analysis justify the costs of performing that review.

[ 2015 c 225 s 45; 2001 c 292 s 1; 1996 c 186 s 404; 1991 c 201 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 186: See notes following RCW 43.330.904.